Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.090

Agent to disclose principal licensee and his endorsement.

Any person applying for an agent's license shall include the name and address of the principal licensee represented or sought to be represented by such agent and the written endorsement or nomination of such principal licensee.

[ 1959 c 139 s 9.]